Hawaii statutes.
PART IX.
VOTING PROCEDURES

§11-131 Hours of voting. The polls
shall be opened by the precinct officials at 7:00 a.m. of the election day and
shall be kept open continuously until 6:00 p.m. of that day. If, at the
closing hour of voting, any voter desiring to vote is standing in line outside
the entrance of the polls with the desire of entering and voting, but due to
the polling place being overcrowded has been unable to do so, the voter shall
be allowed to vote irrespective of the closing hour of voting. No voter shall
be permitted to enter or join the line after the prescribed hour for closing
the polls. If all of the registered voters of the precinct have cast their
votes prior to the closing time, the polls may be closed earlier but the votes
shall not be counted until after closing time unless allowed by the chief
election officer. [L 1970, c 26, pt of §2; am L 1973, c 217, §1(mm); gen ch
1985]

Cross References

Voting systems, see chapter 16.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next